Idaho statutes. Title 27 CEMETERIES AND CREMATORIUMS
Chapter 2
RURAL CEMETERY ASSOCIATIONS

Sec.

§ 27-201. Organization authorized.

Three (3) or more residents of Idaho may organize a corporate nonprofit rural cemetery association as herein provided.

History.

1933, ch. 181, § 1, p. 335; I.C.,§ 28-201 (1948 Ed.); am. 1991, ch. 42, § 1, p. 82.

§ 27-202. Application of Idaho nonprofit corporation act.

Each corporation created under the provisions of this chapter shall be governed by the provisions of the Idaho nonprofit corporation act, except insofar as they may be inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 27-202, as added by 1991, ch. 42, § 3, p. 82.

§ 27-203, 27-204. Governing board — Officers — Articles of incorporation — Filing fees. [Repealed.]

§ 27-205. Members — Meetings — Quorum.

Every person who acquires a lot or lots shall become a member and shall have one (1) vote. Meetings of the members shall be held at least annually at such time and place and upon such notice as may be prescribed by the bylaws. Five (5) or more members shall constitute a quorum to transact all business which the members may lawfully transact.

History.

1933, ch. 181, § 5, p. 335; I.C.,§ 28-205 (1948 Ed.).

§ 27-206. Certificate of membership and title.

Certificates of membership and certificates of title to the lots sold shall be issued in such form as may be provided by the bylaws or by resolutions of the stockholders or directors. It shall not be necessary to record certificates of title to lots sold but a duplicate copy of each certificate shall be retained by the corporation.

History.

1933, ch. 181, § 6, p. 335; I.C.,§ 28-206 (1948 Ed.).